Florida, session 2026, SB1724.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 30 31 Section 1.âSubsections (3) and (4) are added to section 32 180.19, Florida Statutes, to read: 33 180.19âUse by other municipalities and by individuals 34 outside corporate limits.â 35 (3)(a)âA new agreement, or an extension, renewal, or 36 material amendment of an existing agreement, to provide 37 electric, natural gas, water, or sewer utility service at retail 38 pursuant to subsection (1) must be written. Such agreement may 39 not become effective before an appointed representative of the 40 municipality that provides the service or intends to provide 41 service, in conjunction with the governing body of each 42 municipality and unincorporated area served or to be served, has 43 participated in a public meeting, which is not required to be a 44 separate public meeting, within each municipality and 45 unincorporated area served or to be served for purposes of 46 providing information and soliciting public input on: 47 1.âThe nature of the services to be provided or changes to 48 the services being provided; 49 2.âThe rates, fees, and charges to be imposed for the 50 services provided or intended to be provided, including any 51 differential with the rates, fees, and charges imposed for the 52 same services on customers located within the boundaries of the 53 serving municipality, the basis for the differential, and the 54 length of time that the differential is expected to exist; 55 3.âThe extent to which revenues generated from the 56 provision of the services will be used to fund or finance 57 nonutility government functions or services; and 58 4.âAny other matter deemed relevant by the parties to the 59 agreement. 60 (b)âRates, fees, and charges imposed for water or sewer 61 utility services provided pursuant to subsection (1) must comply 62 with s. 180.191. 63 (c)âA representative of each municipality that provides 64 electric, natural gas, water, or sewer utility services pursuant 65 to subsection (1), in conjunction with the governing body of 66 each municipality and unincorporated area in which it provides 67 services, shall annually conduct a public customer meeting, 68 which is not required to be a separate public meeting, within 69 each municipality and unincorporated area for purposes of 70 soliciting public input on utility-related matters, including 71 fees, rates, charges, and services. 72 (d)âFor purposes of this subsection, the term: 73 1.ââAppointed representativeâ means an executive-level 74 leadership employee of a municipality, or of such municipalityâs 75 related and separate utility authority, board, or commission, 76 specifically appointed by the governing body to serve as its 77 representative for the purposes of this subsection. 78 2.ââGoverning bodyâ means a: 79 a.âGoverning body of a municipality in which services are 80 provided or proposed to be extended; or 81 b.âBoard of county commissioners of a county in which 82 services are provided or proposed to be extended, if services 83 are provided or proposed to be extended in an unincorporated 84 area within the county. 85 (4)âA municipality that generates revenue from the 86 provision of electric, natural gas, water, or sewer utility 87 services to locations beyond its corporate limits may not use 88 more than 10 percent of the gross revenues generated from such 89 services to fund or finance general government functions. After 90 the transfer of such revenues to fund or finance general 91 government functions, if any revenues generated from such 92 services remain after payment of the municipal utilityâs costs 93 to provide services, these excess revenues must be reinvested 94 into the municipal utility or returned to customers who received 95 service at locations beyond the municipalityâs corporate limits. 96 Section 2.âSubsection (1) of section 180.191, Florida 97 Statutes, is amended to read: 98 180.191âLimitation on rates charged consumer outside city 99 limits.â 100 (1)âAny municipality within this the state operating a 101 water or sewer utility outside of the boundaries of such 102 municipality shall charge consumers outside the boundaries 103 rates, fees, and charges determined in one of the following 104 manners: 105 (a)âIt may charge the same rates, fees, and charges as 106 consumers inside the municipal boundaries. However, in addition 107 thereto, the municipality may add a surcharge of not more than 108 25 percent of such rates, fees, and charges to consumers outside 109 the boundaries. Fixing of such rates, fees, and charges in this 110 manner may shall not require a public hearing except as may be 111 provided for service to consumers inside the municipality. 112 (b)1.âIt may charge rates, fees, and charges that are just 113 and equitable and which are based on the same factors used in 114 fixing the rates, fees, and charges for consumers inside the 115 municipal boundaries. In addition thereto, the municipality may 116 add a surcharge not to exceed 25 percent of such rates, fees, 117 and charges for said services to consumers outside the 118 boundaries. However, the total of all Such rates, fees, and 119 charges for the services to consumers outside the boundaries may 120 shall not be more than 25 50 percent in excess of the rates, 121 fees, and charges total amount the municipality charges 122 consumers served within the municipality for corresponding 123 service. No Such rates, fees, and charges may not shall be fixed 124 until after a public hearing at which all of the users of the 125 water or sewer systems; owners, tenants, or occupants of 126 property served or to be served thereby; and all others 127 interested shall have an opportunity to be heard concerning the 128 proposed rates, fees, and charges. Any change or revision of 129 such rates, fees, or charges may be made in the same manner as 130 such rates, fees, or charges were originally established, but if 131 such change or revision is to be made substantially pro rata as 132 to all classes of service, both inside and outside the 133 municipality, no hearing or notice shall be required. 134 2.âAny municipality within this state operating a water or 135 sewer utility that provides services to consumers within the 136 boundaries of a separate municipality through the use of a water 137 treatment plant or sewer treatment plant located within the 138 boundaries of that separate municipality may charge consumers in 139 the separate municipality no more than the rates, fees, and 140 charges imposed on consumers inside its own municipal 141 boundaries. 142 Section 3.âEffective July 1, 2027, section 180.192, Florida 143 Statutes, is created to read: 144 180.192âReporting requirements related to municipal utility 145 service.â 146 (1)âBy January 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, each 147 municipality that provides electric, natural gas, water, or 148 sewer utility services pursuant to s. 180.191(1) shall provide a 149 report to the Florida Public Service Commission which 150 identifies, for each type of utility service provided by the 151 municipality: 152 (a)âThe number and percentage of customers that receive 153 utility services provided by the municipality at a location 154 outside the boundaries of the municipality; 155 (b)âThe volume and percentage of sales made to such 156 customers, and the gross revenues generated from such sales; and 157 (c)âWhether the rates, fees, and charges imposed on 158 customers that receive services at a location outside the 159 municipalityâs boundaries are different than the rates, fees, 160 and charges imposed on customers within the boundaries of the 161 municipality, and, if so, the amount and percentage of the 162 differential. 163 (2)âBy March 31, 2028, and annually thereafter, the 164 commission shall compile the information provided pursuant to 165 subsection (1) and submit a report containing this information 166 to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of 167 the House of Representatives. 168 (3)âThis section does not modify or extend the authority of 169 the commission otherwise provided by law with respect to any 170 municipal utility that is required to comply with subsection 171 (1). 172 Section 4.âExcept as otherwise expressly provided in this 173 act, this act shall take effect July 1, 2026.